Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 3 L AKE LANIER ISLANDS DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY
12-3-332. Revenue bonds - Securing by trust indenture.

In the discretion of the authority, any issue of revenue bonds may be secured by a trust indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state. Such trust indenture may pledge or assign rents, revenues, and earnings to be received by the authority.

Either the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or the trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in relation to the acquisition of property, the construction of the project, the maintenance, operation, repair, and insurance of the project, and the custody, safeguarding, and application of all moneys. The resolution or indenture may also provide that any project shall be constructed and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers or architects employed or designated by the authority and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the bonds issued therefor. The resolution or indenture may also require that the security given by contractors and by any depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues or other moneys be satisfactory to such purchasers and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which additional revenue bonds may be issued.

The indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures securing bonds and debentures of corporations. In addition to the foregoing provisions of this Code section, the trust indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority.

All expenses incurred in carrying out the trust indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the project and of the cost of project affected by such indenture.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, §§ 15, 16; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-333. Revenue bonds - Designation of recipient of bond proceeds.

The authority shall, in the resolution providing for issuance of revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to any officer or person who, or any agency, bank, or trust company which, shall act as trustee of such funds and shall hold and apply the same to the purposes expressed in this part, subject to such regulations as this part and such resolution or trust indenture may provide.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 16; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-334. Revenue bonds - Establishment of sinking fund for payment of principal, interest, and other costs.

The revenues, rents, and earnings derived from any particular project or combined project; any and all funds from any source received by any department, board, commission, or agency of the State of Georgia, and pledged and allocated by it to the authority as security for the performance of any lease or leases; or, unless otherwise pledged and allocated, any and all revenues, rents, and earnings received by the authority, regardless of whether or not such rents, earnings, and revenues were produced by a particular project for which bonds have been issued, may be pledged and allocated by the authority to the payment of the principal and interest on revenue bonds of the authority as the trust indenture or the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds may provide.

Such funds so pledged from whatever source received, which pledge may include funds received from one or more or all sources, shall be set aside at regular intervals, as may be provided in the resolution or trust indenture, into a sinking fund which shall be pledged to and charged with the payment of:

The interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall fall due;

The principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due;

The necessary charges of paying agents for paying principal and interest; and

Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase.

The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust indenture, but, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or trust indenture, such sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all revenue bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

Subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, or subject to the trust indenture, surplus moneys in the sinking fund may be applied to the purchasing or redemption of bonds, and any such bonds so purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be canceled and shall not again be issued.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-335. Revenue bonds - Remedies of bondholders, coupon holders, and trustees.

Except to the extent the rights given in this Code section may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of bonds or by a trust indenture, any holder of revenue bonds or interest coupons issued under this part, any receiver for such holders, or any indenture trustee, if any, may either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State of Georgia or granted by this part or under such resolution or trust indenture. Such holder, receiver, or trustee may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this part, or by resolution or trust indenture, to be performed by the authority or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and collecting of revenues, rents, and other charges for the use of the project or projects. In the event of default of the authority upon the principal and interest obligations of any revenue bond issue, such holder, receiver, or trustee shall be subrogated to each and every right, specifically including the contract rights of collecting rental, which the authority may possess against the state or any department, agency, or institution of the state and, in the pursuit of his or its remedies as subrogee, may proceed either at law or in equity, by action, mandamus, or other proceedings, to collect any sums by such proceedings due and owing to the authority and pledged or partially pledged directly or indirectly to the benefit of the revenue bond issue of which such holder, receiver, or trustee is representative. No holder, receiver, or trustee shall have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state to pay any such bond or the interest thereon, or to enforce the payment thereof against any property of the state, nor shall any such bond constitute a charge, lien, or encumbrance, legal or equitable, upon the property of the state.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-336. Revenue bonds - Revenue refunding bonds.

The authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued under this part and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The issuance of such revenue refunding bonds, the maturities, and all other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this part insofar as the same may be applicable.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-337. Revenue bonds - Protection of bondholders; part as constituting a contract with bondholders.

While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or existence of the authority, or of its officers, employees, or agents, or of any department, board, commission, or agency of the state, shall not be diminished or impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds, and no other entity, department, division, agency, or authority will be created which will compete with the authority to such an extent as to affect adversely the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds, nor will the state itself so compete with the authority. This part shall be for the benefit of the state, the authority, and the holders of any such bonds and, upon the issuance of bonds under this part, shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 18; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-338. Revenue bonds - Validation.

Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with the procedure of Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36. The petition for validation shall also make party defendant to such action any authority, division, subdivision, instrumentality, or agency of the State of Georgia which, or any person who, has contracted with the Lake Lanier Islands Development Authority for the use of any building, structure, or facilities for which bonds have been issued and sought to be validated. Such authority, division, subdivision, instrumentality, agency, or person shall be required to show cause, if any, why such contract or contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not be inquired into by the court, the validity of the terms thereof determined, and the contract adjudicated as security for the payment of any such bonds of the authority. The bonds when validated and the judgment of validation shall be final and conclusive with respect to such bonds and against the authority issuing the same and against any authority, division, subdivision, instrumentality, department, agency, or person contracting with the authority.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, § 14; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2.)

12-3-339. Authority property, activities, income, and bonds exempt from taxation and assessment.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and constitute a public purpose and that the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this part. This state covenants with the holders of the bonds that the authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired or leased by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision, or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the buildings erected or acquired by it, or upon any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such buildings, or upon other income received by the authority. Further, this state covenants that the bonds of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state. The exemption provided in this Code section shall include an exemption from state and local sales and use tax on property purchased by the authority for use exclusively by the authority.

(Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 841, § 1.)

12-3-340. Conflicts of interest; applicability of other laws regulating conduct; contracts voidable by authority.

Every member of the authority and every employee of the authority who knowingly has any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract to which the authority is or is about to become a party, or in any other business of the authority, or in any firm or corporation doing business with the authority, shall make full disclosure of such interest to the authority. Failure to disclose such an interest shall constitute cause for which an authority member may be removed or an employee discharged or otherwise disciplined at the discretion of the authority.

Provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16, Code Sections 16-10-21, 16-10-22, and Code Sections 16-10-92 and 16-10-93, regulating the conduct of officers, employees, and agents of political subdivisions, municipal and other public corporations, and other public organizations, shall be applicable to the conduct of members, officers, employees, and agents of the authority.

Any contract or transaction of the authority involving a conflict of interest not disclosed under subsection (a) of this Code section, or involving a violation of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16, Code Sections 16-10-21, 16-10-22, and Code Sections 16-10-92 and 16-10-93, or involving a violation of any other provision of law regulating conflicts of interest which is applicable to the authority or its members, officers, or employees shall be voidable by the authority.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 731, § 2; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1132, § 4.)

12-3-341. Venue and jurisdiction of actions under part.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this part shall be brought in the Superior Court of Hall County, Georgia, and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under this part shall likewise be brought in such court, which shall have exclusive original jurisdiction of such actions.

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 736, §§ 14, 17; Ga. L. 1969, p. 397, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 377, § 1.)

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1986, p. 377,

§

2, not codified by the General Assembly, provided: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor [approved March 26, 1986] or upon its becoming law without such approval and shall be applicable to any suit or action filed on or after that date. The provisions of this Act shall not affect any suit or action filed prior to the effective date of this Act in the Superior Court of Fulton County."